Utah statutes.
4-17-4.   County Weed Control Board -- Appointment -- Composition -- Terms
-- Removal -- Compensation.
(1)  Each county executive of the counties may, with the advice and consent of
the county legislative body, appoint a county weed control board comprised of
not less than three nor more than five appointed members.
(2) (a)  If the county legislative body is the county commission, the chair of
the county legislative body shall appoint one member of the county legislative
body who shall act as a coordinator between the county and the weed board.
(b)  If the county legislative body is a county council, the county executive
shall serve on the county weed control board and act as coordinator between
the county and the weed board.
(3)  Two members of the board shall be farmers or ranchers whose primary
source of income is derived from production agriculture.
(4)  Members are appointed to four year terms of office and serve with or
without compensation as determined by each county legislative body.
(5)  Members may be removed for cause and any vacancy which occurs on a county
weed control board shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term of
the vacated member.
